Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2001YH (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 71 Section 1. Section 321.492A, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 321.492A Quotas on for stops and citations prohibited. 3 A political subdivision or agency of the state shall not 4 order, mandate, require, or in any other manner, directly 5 or indirectly, suggest to a peace officer employed by the 6 political subdivision or agency that the peace officer shall 7 stop a certain number of persons committing an alleged traffic 8 violation or issue a certain number of traffic citations, 9 police citations, memorandums of traffic violations, or 10 memorandums of faulty equipment on a daily, weekly, monthly, 11 quarterly, or yearly basis. 12